Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.360

Interest arbitration panel decision to be final—Superior court jurisdiction and review—Not binding on legislature.

(1) If the representative of either or both the uniformed personnel and the employer refuse to submit to the procedures set forth in RCW 41.80.310 and 41.80.320, the parties, or the commission on its own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for the county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. A failure to obey such order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

(2) Except as provided in this subsection, a decision of the arbitration panel shall be final and binding on the parties, and may be enforced at the instance of either party, the arbitration panel or the commission in the superior court for the county where the dispute arose.

(a) The written determination is subject to review by the superior court upon the application of either party solely upon the question of whether the decision of the panel was arbitrary or capricious.

(b) The written determination is not binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the funds necessary to implement provisions pertaining to compensation and fringe benefits of an arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not binding on the state.

[ 2019 c 234 s 9.]